Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.496

Members' interests—Transfer restriction.

The limited liability company may restrict the transfer of members' interests in the limited liability company from the date the demand for their payment is received until the proposed merger becomes effective or the restriction is released under this article.

[ 2015 c 188 s 95.]